Hawaii statutes.
[Part III.] expedited partner therapy

[§453-51] Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Expedited partner therapy" means the
indirect treatment of partners of a patient who has been diagnosed as having a
sexually transmitted disease through the dispensing or prescribing of
antibiotic therapy for the treatment of the partners to the patient without the
physical examination of the partners by a health professional.

"Health professional" means any of
the following:

(1) A person licensed or otherwise authorized by law
to practice medicine or surgery under this chapter and whose scope of practice
includes the diagnosis and treatment of sexually transmitted diseases;

(2) An advanced practice registered nurse with
prescriptive authority under chapter 457 and duly licensed in the State; or

(3) For the purpose of dispensing antibiotic therapy
under this section, a pharmacist who is licensed or otherwise authorized to
engage in the practice of pharmacy under chapter 461.

"Sexual activity" means sexual
intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio, anal intercourse, or any other intrusion,
however slight, of any part of a person's body or of any object into the
genital or anal openings of another person's body, but emission of semen is not
required.

"Sexually transmitted disease" means
chlamydia, gonorrhea, or other sexually transmitted diseases that are or may be
recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for expedited
partner therapy. [L 2013, c 250, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next